North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1A. Legislative Retirement System.
§ 120-4.27.
Death benefit.

The designated beneficiary of a member who dies while in service after completing one year of creditable service shall receive a lump-sum payment of an amount equal to the deceased member’s highest annual salary, to a maximum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). For purposes of this death benefit “in service” means currently serving as a member of the North Carolina General Assembly. “In service” also means service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Public Law 103-353, if that service begins during the member’s term of office. If the participant does not return immediately after that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, then the participant shall be deemed “in service” until the date on which the participant was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary military service.

The death benefit provided by this section shall be designated a group life insurance benefit payable under an employee welfare benefit plan that is separate and apart from the Retirement System but under which the members of the Retirement System shall participate and be eligible for group life insurance benefits. The Board of Trustees is authorized to provide the death benefit in the form of group life insurance either by purchasing a contract or contracts of group life insurance with any life insurance company or companies licensed and authorized to transact business in the State of North Carolina for the purpose of insuring the lives of qualified members in service, or by establishing or affiliating with a separate trust fund qualified under Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System or Retirement Fund on or after July 1, 1988, but before January 1, 1999, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member, or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Retirement System on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Retirement System, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon the completion of twenty-four months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of twenty-four months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System or Retirement Fund on or after January 1, 1999, but before July 1, 2004, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member, or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Retirement System on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Retirement System, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System or Retirement Fund on or after July 1, 2004, but before July 1, 2007, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member, or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Retirement System on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Retirement System, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of nine thousand dollars ($9,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System or Retirement Fund on or after July 1, 2007, but before January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member, or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Retirement System on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Retirement System, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a retired member of the Retirement System or Retirement Fund on or after January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the person or persons designated by the member or, if the member has not designated a beneficiary, to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member or, if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, to the deceased retired member’s legal representative; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of the member’s death required contributions as determined by the Retirement System on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Retirement System, to a group death benefit trust fund, the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Benefit Trust, administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. Employer and non-employer contributions to the Benefit Trust and earnings on those contributions are irrevocable. The assets of the Benefit Trust are dedicated to providing benefits to members and beneficiaries in accordance with the Plan’s benefit terms. The assets of the Benefit Trust are not subject to the claims of creditors of the employees and non-employees making contributions to the Benefit Trust, are not subject to the claims of any creditors of the Benefit Trust’s trustees and administrators, and are not subject to the claims of creditors of members and beneficiaries. Benefit Trust assets may be used for reasonable expenses to administer benefits provided by the Fund as approved by the Board of Trustees.

The death benefit payable under this subsection shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, or surviving spouse if not survived by a designated beneficiary, or legal representative if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1985, c. 400, s. 9; 1987, c. 824, s. 1; 1998-212, s. 28.27(d); 2004-147, s. 4; 2007-496, s. 3; 2009-66, s. 6(d); 2014-112, s. 3(d); 2017-129, s. 2(q).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-147, s. 4, effective July 1, 2004, added the section heading, which already existed; inserted “but before July 1, 2004,” in the first sentence of the fourth paragraph; and added the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2007-496, s. 3, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to eligible retirees who die on or after that date, inserted “but before July 1, 2007” following “July 1, 2004” in the first sentence of the next-to-last paragraph; and added the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 6(d), effective July 1, 2009, added the last two sentences in the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2014-112, s. 3(d), effective January 1, 2015, inserted “but before January 1, 2015” in the first sentence of the sixth paragraph; and added the final paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-129, s. 2(q), effective June 30, 2017, divided the former last paragraph into the present next-to-last and last paragraphs; in the present next-to-last paragraph substituted “the member’s death required” for “his death required” and inserted “the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Benefit Trust” in the proviso in the first sentence, and added the last three sentences; and substituted “The death benefit payable under this subsection” for “This death benefit” in the first sentence of the present last paragraph.

§ 120-4.28.
Survivor’s alternate benefit.

The designated beneficiary of a member who dies in service before retirement but after age 60 and after completing five years of creditable service or after completing 12 years of creditable service is entitled to Option 2 prescribed by

G.S. 120-4.26

.

In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the one and only one beneficiary designated to receive a return of accumulated contributions pursuant to this subsection and that beneficiary dies before the total of the retirement allowances paid equals the amount of those accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowances paid to the beneficiary, the allowance shall be paid in a lump sum to the person or persons the member has designated as the contingent beneficiary for return of accumulated contributions, if the person or persons are living at the time the payment falls due, otherwise to the one and only one beneficiary’s legal representative.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 199; 1985, c. 400, s. 3; 1987, c. 738, ss. 31(d), 37(c); 2012-130, s. 5.

§ 120-4.29.
Exemption from garnishment, attachment.

Except for the applications of the provisions of G. S. 110-136, and in connection with a court-ordered equitable distribution under

G.S. 50-20

, the right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, or to the receipt of the pension, annuity or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this Article, and the moneys in the various funds created by this Article, are exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever, and shall be unassignable except as this Article specifically provides. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, any overpayment of benefits or erroneous payments to a member in a State-administered retirement system, the Disability Salary Continuation Plan, or the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina, including any benefits paid to, or State Health Plan premiums or claims paid on behalf of, any member who is later determined to have been ineligible for those benefits or unentitled to those amounts, may be offset against any retirement allowance, return of contributions, or any other right accruing under this Article to the same person, the person’s estate, or designated beneficiary.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1985, c. 402; c. 649, s. 5; 1989, c. 792, s. 2.2; 1991, c. 636, s. 13; 2017-135, s. 9(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-135, s. 9(c), effective July 20, 2017, rewrote the second sentence which formerly read: “Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, any overpayment of benefits to a member in a State-administered retirement system or Disability Salary Continuation Plan may be offset against any retirement allowance, return of contributions or any other right accruing under this Chapter to the same person, the person’s estate, or designated beneficiary.”

§ 120-4.30.
Termination or partial termination; discontinuance of contributions.

In the event of the termination or partial termination of the Retirement System or in the event of complete discontinuance of contributions under the Retirement System, the rights of all affected members to benefits accrued to the date of such termination, partial termination, or discontinuance, to the extent funded as of such date, or the amounts credited to the members’ accounts, shall be nonforfeitable and fully vested.

History.

1987, c. 177, s. 1(a), (b).

§ 120-4.31.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, compensation for any calendar year after 1988 in which employee or employer contributions are made and for which annual compensation is used for computing any benefit under this Article shall not exceed the higher of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 1989; provided the imposition of the limitation shall not reduce a member’s benefit below the amount determined as of December 31, 1988.Effective January 1, 1996, the annual compensation of a member taken into account for determining all benefits provided under this Article shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted pursuant to section 401(a)(17)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued under the Code. However, with respect to a person who became a member of the Retirement System prior to January 1, 1996, the imposition of this limitation on compensation shall not reduce the amount of compensation which may be taken into account for determining the benefits of that member under this Article below the amount of compensation which would have been recognized under the provisions of this Article in effect on July 1, 1993.Effective January 1, 2002, the annual compensation of a person, who became a member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 1996, taken into account for determining all benefits accruing under this Article for any plan year after December 31, 2001, shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount otherwise set by the Internal Revenue Code or determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 2002.All the provisions in this subsection have been enacted to make clear that the Plan shall not base contributions or Plan benefits on annual compensation in excess of the limits prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted from time to time, subject to certain federal grandfathering rules.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual benefit payable on behalf of a member shall, if necessary, be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(b) and with respect to calendar years commencing prior to January 1, 2000, Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate pursuant to Section 415(d) of the Code. If a member is a participant under any qualified defined contributions plan that is required to be taken into account for the purposes of the limitation contained in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual benefit payable under this Article shall be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(e) prior to making any reduction under the defined contribution plan provided by the employer. However, with respect to a member who has benefits accrued under this Article but whose benefit had not commenced as of December 31, 1999, the combined plan limitation contained in Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applied to such member for calendar years commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

On and after September 8, 2009, and for all Plan years to which the minimum distribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code are applicable, with respect to any member who has terminated employment, the Plan shall comply with federal income tax minimum distribution rules by applying a reasonable and good faith interpretation to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c1)

A member who has contributions in this System and is not eligible for a retirement benefit as set forth in

G.S. 120-4.21

shall be paid his or her contributions in a lump sum as provided in

G.S. 120-4.25

by April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a member of the General Assembly, except by death. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to complete a refund application by the required date, then the requirement that a refund application be completed shall be waived and the refund shall be paid without a refund application as a single lump-sum payment with applicable required North Carolina and federal income taxes withheld.A member who has contributions in this System and is eligible for a retirement benefit as set forth in

G.S. 120-4.21

shall begin to receive a monthly benefit no later than April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member (i) attains 72 years of age or (ii) has ceased to be a member of the General Assembly, except by death. If the member fails, following reasonable notification, to complete the retirement process as set forth under Chapter 120 of the General Statutes by the required beginning date, then the requirement that a retirement application and an election of payment plan form be completed shall be waived and the retirement allowance shall be paid as a single life annuity. The single life annuity shall be calculated and processed in accordance with G.S. 120-4.21.For purposes of this subsection, a member shall not be considered to have ceased to be a member of the General Assembly if the member is actively contributing to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. A retirement benefit or lump-sum refund shall not be paid under this subsection if the member is actively contributing to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, or Consolidated Judicial Retirement System.

This subsection applies to distributions and rollovers from the Plan. The Plan does not have mandatory distributions within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. With respect to distributions from the Plan and notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan to the contrary that would otherwise limit a distributee’s election under this Article, a distributee (including, after December 31, 2006, a non-spouse beneficiary if that non-spouse beneficiary elects a direct rollover only to an inherited traditional or Roth IRA as permitted under applicable federal law) may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Plan administrator, to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover. As used in this subsection, an “eligible retirement plan” means an individual retirement account described in Section 408(a) of the Code, an individual retirement annuity described in Section 408(b) of the Code, an annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the Code, on and after January 1, 2009, a Roth IRA, or a qualified trust described in Section 401(a) of the Code, that accepts the distributee’s eligible rollover distribution. Effective on and after January 1, 2002, an eligible retirement plan also means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Code and an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and which agrees to separately account for amounts transferred into that plan from this Plan. As used in this subsection, a “direct rollover” is a payment by the Plan to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee. Provided, an eligible rollover distribution is any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except that an eligible rollover distribution shall not include: any distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments (not less frequently than annually) made for the life (or life expectancy) of the distributee or the joint lives (or joint life expectancies) of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary, or for a specified period of 10 years or more; any distribution to the extent such distribution is required under section 401(a)(9) of the Code; and the portion of any distribution that is not includible in gross income (determined without regard to the exclusion for net realized appreciation with respect to employer securities). Effective as of January 1, 2002, and notwithstanding the exclusion of any after-tax portion from such a rollover distribution in the preceding sentence, a portion of a distribution shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions that are not includible in gross income. That portion may be transferred, pursuant to applicable federal law, to an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or (b) of the Code, to a qualified defined benefit plan, or to a qualified defined contribution plan described in Section 401(a), 403(a), or 403(b) of the Code that agrees to separately account for amounts so transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of such distribution which is includible in gross income and the portion of such distribution which is not so includible. The definition of eligible retirement plan shall also apply in the case of a distribution to surviving spouse, or to a spouse or former spouse who is the alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a court-ordered equitable distribution of marital property, as provided under

G.S. 50-20.1

. Effective on and after January 1, 2007, notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a nonspouse beneficiary of a deceased member may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator of the Board of Trustees of this Retirement System, to directly roll over any portion of the beneficiary’s distribution from the Retirement System; however, such rollover shall conform with the provisions of section 402(c)(11) of the Code.

History.

1989, c. 276, s. 1; 1993, c. 531, s. 2; 1995, c. 361, s. 4; 2002-71, s. 2; 2009-66, s. 1(c); 2012-130, s. 4(a); 2015-164, s. 10(d); 2020-48, s. 1.2(d).

§ 120-4.32.
Deduction for payments allowed.

Any beneficiary who is a member of a domiciled employees’ or retirees’ association that has at least 2,000 members, the majority of whom are active or retired employees of the State or public school employees, may authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees’ or retirees’ association. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary. A plan of deductions pursuant to this section shall become void if the employees’ or retirees’ association engages in collective bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative unit.

Any beneficiary eligible for coverage under the State Health Plan may also authorize, in writing, the monthly deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits of a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan for any dependent whom the beneficiary wishes to cover under the State Health Plan. In the event that the beneficiary’s own State Health Plan coverage is contributory, in whole or in part, the beneficiary may also authorize a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan on behalf of the beneficiary. In addition, a beneficiary may similarly authorize the deduction for supplemental voluntary insurance benefits, provided that the deduction is authorized by the Department of State Treasurer and is payable to a company with which the Department of State Treasurer has or had an exclusive contractual relationship. Any such authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary.

History.

2002-126, s. 6.4(d); 2012-178, s. 4(a).

§ 120-4.33.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies.

Except as provided in

G.S. 120-4.12(f)

, the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under the federal laws listed in subsection (b) of this section or the laws of this State listed in subsection (c) of this section if all of the following apply:

The federal or State offense is committed while serving as a member of the General Assembly.

The conduct on which the federal or State offense is based is directly related to the member’s service as a member of the General Assembly.

The federal offenses covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of 18 U.S.C. § 201 (Bribery of public officials and witnesses), 18 U.S.C. § 286 (Conspiracy to defraud the Government with respect to claims), 18 U.S.C. § 287 (False, fictitious or fraudulent claims), 18 U.S.C. § 371 (Conspiracy to commit offense or to defraud United States), 18 U.S.C. § 597 (Expenditures to influence voting), 18 U.S.C. § 599 (Promise of appointment by candidate), 18 U.S.C. § 606 (Intimidation to secure political contributions), 18 U.S.C. § 641 (Public money, property, or records), 18 U.S.C. § 666 (Embezzlement and theft), 18 U.S.C. § 1001 (Statements or entries generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1341 (Frauds and swindles), 18 U.S.C. § 1343 (Fraud by wire, radio, or television), 18 U.S.C. § 1503 (Influencing or injuring officer or juror generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1951 (Interference with commerce by threats or violence), 18 U.S.C. § 1952 (Interstate and foreign travel or transportation in aid of racketeering enterprises), 18 U.S.C. § 1956 (Laundering of monetary instruments), 18 U.S.C. § 1962 (Prohibited activities), or section 7201 of the Internal Revenue Code (Attempt to evade or defeat tax).

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The offenses under the laws of this State covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of Article 29, 30, or 30A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes (Relating to bribery, obstructing justice, and secret listening) or

G.S. 14-228

(Buying and selling offices), or Part 1 of Article 14 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes (Code of Legislative Ethics), Article 20 or 22 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes (Relating to absentee ballots, corrupt practices and other offenses against the elective franchise, and regulating of contributions and expenditures in political campaigns).

Perjury or false information as follows:

Perjury committed under

G.S. 14-209

in falsely denying the commission of an act that constitutes an offense within the purview of an offense listed in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section.

Subornation of perjury committed under

G.S. 14-210

in connection with the false denial of another as specified by subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Perjury under Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

All monies forfeited under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund.

History.

2007-179, s. 1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Part 1 of Article 21 or Article 22 of Chapter 163A” for “Article 20 or 22 of Chapter 163” in subsection (c)(1); and substituted “Article 23 of Chapter 163A” for “Article 22A of Chapter 163” in subsection (c)(2)c.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

§ 120-4.33A.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to employment or holding office.

Except as provided in

G.S. 120-4.12(g)

, the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under federal law or the laws of this State if all of the following apply:

The offense is committed while the member is serving as a member of the General Assembly.

The conduct resulting in the member’s conviction is directly related to the member’s office.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 4.3(d), effective June 26, 2020.

If a member or former member whose benefits under the System were forfeited under this section, except for the return of member contributions plus interest, subsequently receives an unconditional pardon of innocence, or the conviction is vacated or set aside for any reason, then the member or former member may seek a reversal of the benefit forfeiture by presenting sufficient evidence to the State Treasurer. If the State Treasurer determines a reversal of the benefit forfeiture is appropriate, then all benefits will be restored upon repayment of all accumulated contributions plus interest. Repayment of all accumulated contributions that have been received by the individual under the forfeiture provisions of this section must be made in a total lump-sum payment with interest compounded annually at a rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of forfeiture to the year of repayment. An individual receiving a reversal of benefit forfeiture must receive reinstatement of the service credit forfeited.

History.

2012-193, s. 7; 2020-48, s. 4.3(d).

Cross References.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to public employment by or holding office in counties, cities, and towns, see

G.S. 128-38.4

A.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-18.10

A.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits under the Judicial Retirement Act for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-75.1

A.

§ 120-4.33B.
Prohibition on purchase of forfeited service.

Any member whose retirement benefits have been forfeited under

G.S. 120-4.3

or

G.S. 120-4.3

A is prohibited from subsequently purchasing or repurchasing either those forfeited benefits or any creditable membership service associated with those forfeited benefits and that service may not be used for the purposes of eligibility for benefits in any retirement system that provides reciprocal benefits.

History.

2018-52, s. 6(d); 2020-48, s. 4.5(d).

§ 120-4.34.
Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance.

A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the person, with the intent to defraud, receives money as a result of cashing, depositing, or receiving a direct deposit of a decedent’s retirement allowance and the person (i) knows that he or she is not entitled to the decedent’s retirement allowance, (ii) receives the benefit at least two months after the date of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death, and (iii) does not attempt to inform this Retirement System of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death.

History.

2011-232, s. 10(d); 2013-288, s. 9(e).